Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.550

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Copies as proof of ordinances.

Copies of such codes in published form shall be received without further proof as the ordinances of permanent and general effect of the city or town in all courts and administrative tribunals of this state.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.550. Prior: 1957 c 97 s 6.]

NOTES:

Ordinances, admissibility as evidence: RCW 5.44.080.